Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.288

Youth suicide prevention activities.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall work with state agency and community partners to assist schools in implementing youth suicide prevention activities, which may include the following:

(a) Training for school employees, parents, community members, and students in recognizing and responding to the signs of suicide;

(b) Partnering with local coalitions of community members interested in preventing youth suicide; and

(c) Responding to communities determined to be in crisis after a suicide or attempted suicide to prevent further instances of suicide.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, working with state and community partners, shall prioritize funding appropriated for subsection (1) of this section to communities identified as the highest risk.

[ 2014 c 103 s 2; 2011 c 185 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—2014 c 103: "The legislature finds that according to the department of health, suicide is the second leading cause of death for Washington youth between the ages of ten and twenty-four. Suicide rates among Washington's youth remain higher than the national average. An increasing body of research shows an association between adverse childhood experiences such as trauma, violence, or abuse, and decreased student learning and achievement. Underserved youth populations in Washington who are not receiving access to state services continue to remain at risk for suicide." [ 2014 c 103 s 1.]

Finding—2011 c 185: See note following RCW 28A.300.2851.